Hawaii, session 2025, HB249.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that family-child interaction learning programs provide children from birth to age five with engaging, literacy-rich early learning environments that foster social and emotional development and support school readiness.  Family-child interaction learning programs include two main components:  high-quality early childhood learning and parent education, which equips parents and caregivers with the knowledge and skills to support their children's education and healthy family dynamics.  Additionally, family-child interaction learning programs employ multi-generational, culturally responsive approaches and typically work with families who choose to have their children cared for by a parent, grandparent, or other family caregiver, rather than utilizing center-based child care options. The legislature further finds that family-child interaction learning programs are uniquely positioned to improve early detection of developmental delays, expand access to infant and early childhood mental health services, and connect families with a wide variety of social services. The purpose of this Act is to expand the availability of family-child interaction learning programs in the State by appropriating funds to the executive office on early learning to contract with third-party providers of family-child interaction learning programs. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the executive office on early learning to contract with third-party providers of family-child interaction learning programs, which include but are not limited to the delivery of infant and early childhood mental health consultations and related services. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the executive office on early learning for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________